Connecticut, session 2026, HB05523.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) There is established a
Connecticut Tribal Wildlife and Fisheries Advisory Council. Said
advisory council consists of the following members who voluntarily
agree to serve on such advisory council: (1) Two members from and
selected by the Mashantucket Pequot Tribal Nation, (2) two members
from and selected by the Mohegan Tribe, (3) two members from each of
the following tribes, as selected by each respective tribe: (A) The Eastern
Pequot Tribe, (B) the Golden Hill Paugussett Tribe, and (C) the
Schaghticoke Tribe, (4) the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection, or the commissioner's designee, (5) one member each from
the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection's Wildlife
Division, Fisheries Division and Forestry Division, as appointed by the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, (6) one
member from the Department of Agriculture, (7) one member from the
Bureau of Aquaculture of the Department of Agriculture, (8) one
member from the Connecticut Agricultural Experiment Station, (9) one
member from Connecticut Sea Grant, (10) one member from the Native
American and Indigenous Studies Department at The University of
Connecticut, and (11) the chairpersons and ranking members of the joint
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5523
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to the environment, or their designees.
(b) The tribal members of the advisory council shall develop written
procedures for meetings, at such members' discretion, which shall be
distributed to all members of the advisory council. Nontribal members
of such advisory council shall attend meetings on a quarterly basis, at
the invitation of the tribal members.
(c) Such advisory council shall: (1) Make recommendations to the
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection on how state
conservation plans and policies can integrate tribal ecological
knowledge and stewardship practices, and (2) promote the sustainable
use of natural resources consistent with state conservation goals.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to lands held
in federal trust for any tribe or to reservation lands, which remain under
tribal jurisdiction.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of
Energy and Environmental Protection shall provide, at no cost, hunting
and fishing permits to any enrolled member of a federally or state-
recognized tribe identified in subsection (b) of section 47-59a of the
general statutes for lawful activities conducted off reservation lands.
(b) Any activities conducted pursuant to this section shall remain
subject to state conservation goals, seasons and species protections.
(c) The commissioner shall also provide access to conservation
education, hunter safety and firearms safety programs to such tribal
members.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
Agriculture shall prioritize tribal meat, fish and aquaculture processing
facilities for technical assistance, United States Department of
Agriculture certification support and eligibility for state or federal
infrastructure funding programs. Such prioritization shall support tribal
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5523
food sovereignty, local food systems and community-based economic
development.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 New section
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3